Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.38.090

Functionally unregulated out-of-state trust institutions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an out-of-state trust institution engaging in trust business in Washington state, which is not an exempt person under RCW 30B.04.040 and which by reason of the laws of its home state is not, in the opinion of the director, subject to supervision, examination, or other safety and soundness oversight by a home state regulator, shall be subject to all the requirements of a state trust company under this title.

[ 2019 c 389 s 54; 2014 c 37 s 375.]